Washington statutes.
RCW 18.280.200

Military training or experience.

An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director determines that the military training or experience is not substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

[ 2011 c 351 s 15.]